Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑46] Taxes. Unless the
power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting
general authority with respect to taxes shall authorize the agent to:

(1) Prepare, sign, and file federal, state, local,
and foreign income, gift, payroll, property, Federal Insurance Contributions
Act, and other tax returns, claims for refunds, requests for extension of time,
petitions regarding tax matters, and any other tax-related documents, including
receipts, offers, waivers, consents, including consents and agreements under
Internal Revenue Code section 2032A, [title 26] United States Code section
2032A, as amended, closing agreements, and any power of attorney required by
the Internal Revenue Service or other taxing authority with respect to a tax
year upon which the statute of limitations has not run and the following
twenty-five tax years;

(2) Pay taxes due, collect refunds, post bonds,
receive confidential information, and contest deficiencies determined by the
Internal Revenue Service or other taxing authority;

(3) Exercise any election available to the principal
under federal, state, local, or foreign tax law; and

(4) Act for the principal in all tax matters for all
periods before the Internal Revenue Service, or other taxing authority. [L
2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next